Utah statutes.
26-1-14.   Executive director -- Appointment, removal, and compensation of division directors.

The executive director shall have administrative jurisdiction over the directors of the divisions and offices established under Section 26-1-13. Each director shall be appointed by the executive director and may be removed at the will of the executive director.  The directors shall be compensated in an amount fixed by the executive director.  The division directors shall be experienced in administration and have knowledge and be familiar with their areas of responsibility.

